Tennessee, session 114, HB1125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-203(c)(1), is amended by
deleting "five (5) business days" and substituting "ten (10) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1125
002656
- 1 -